Kentucky, session 2025RS, HB305.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
Section 1. KRS 164.0401 is amended to read as follows:
For the purposes of KRS 164.0401 to 164.0407:
(1) "Council" means the Council on Postsecondary Education;
(2) "Dedicated funds" means a gift, grant, or donation to the fund that is subject to restrictions imposed by a
private grantor under KRS 164.0401 to 164.0407;
(3) "Eligible healthcare credential" means:
(a) An[A licensed] alcohol and drug counselor license, [licensed ]clinical alcohol and drug counselor
license, [licensed ]clinical alcohol and drug counselor associate license, professional art therapist
license, professional art therapist associate license, or community health worker certificate issued
pursuant to KRS Chapter 309;
(b) Any emergency medical services license or certificate issued pursuant to KRS Chapter 311A;
(c) Any medical imaging, radiation, or other license issued pursuant to KRS Chapter 311B;
(d) A dental hygienist or dental assistant license issued pursuant to KRS Chapter 313;
(e) Any nursing license or certificate issued pursuant to KRS Chapter 314 or registration as a state[-
]registered nursing aide with the Kentucky Board of Nursing;
(f) A respiratory care practitioner certificate issued pursuant to KRS Chapter 314A;
(g) Any psychology license or certificate issued pursuant to KRS Chapter 319;
(h) Any occupational therapy license issued pursuant to KRS Chapter 319A;
(i) Any behavior analyst license issued pursuant to KRS Chapter 319C;
(j) Any physical therapy certificate or license issued pursuant to KRS Chapter 327;[ and]
(k) Any social worker, marriage and family therapist, or professional counselor certificate or license issued
pursuant to KRS Chapter 335;
(l) A physician assistant license issued pursuant to KRS Chapter 311; and
(m) A dietitian license or nutritionist certificate issued pursuant to KRS Chapter 310;
(4) "Grantor" means an individual or an entity that gifts, grants, or donates moneys to the Kentucky healthcare
workforce investment fund established in KRS 164.0402;
(5) "Healthcare partner" means a grantor to the Kentucky healthcare workforce investment fund that is:
(a) A healthcare provider as defined in KRS 367.4081;
(b) A healthcare facility licensed by and operating in Kentucky;
(c) A qualified mental health professional as defined in KRS 202A.011; or
(d) Any healthcare or healthcare-related association, individual, or corporation doing business in and
incorporated under the laws of the Commonwealth;
(6) "Healthcare program" means an education or training program that is a specific requirement to an eligible
healthcare credential, including but not limited to a high school healthcare vocational program;
(7) "Historically underserved county" means a county of the Commonwealth with enhanced workforce demands,
as demonstrated by:
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version

2 ACTS OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY
(a) Objective healthcare workforce data that demonstrates needs and demands upon its healthcare
workforce that exceed the statewide average; and
(b) Final unemployment figures calculated by the Department of Workforce Development demonstrating a
countywide rate of unemployment that exceeds the statewide unemployment rate of the
Commonwealth:
1. In the most recent five (5) consecutive calendar years; or
2. By two hundred percent (200%) in the most recent calendar year; and
(8) "Kentucky resident" is a Kentucky resident as defined by the council pursuant to KRS 164.020(8).
Section 2. KRS 164.0403 is amended to read as follows:
(1) The council shall reserve at least sixty-five percent (65%) of all net moneys in the Kentucky healthcare
workforce investment fund for partnership proposals between healthcare programs and healthcare partners to
provide healthcare training scholarships to Kentucky residents enrolled in healthcare programs in Kentucky.
(2) In accepting partnerships, the council shall evaluate each partnership proposal to determine if the proposal
meets the requirements of this section and administrative regulations promulgated by the council. The
administrative regulations shall create a process to prioritize accepting partnerships to proposals:
(a) Targeted to address the specific needs of a historically underserved county or to improve racial and
ethnic diversity within a specific designated healthcare credential targeted by the partnership;
(b) Targeted to reduce the workforce demand of a specific eligible healthcare credential that is determined
by the council, based on objective criteria, to be among the highest in demand in the Commonwealth; or
(c) From healthcare partners with fifty (50) or fewer employees.
(3) A partnership shall require a written partnership contract between a healthcare program, healthcare partner,
and the council. The partnership contract shall:
(a) Prohibit any disbursement of moneys from the Kentucky healthcare workforce investment fund until the
moneys appropriated by the General Assembly to be distributed are matched, at least dollar for dollar,
with moneys deposited to the fund by the healthcare partner;
(b) Require the healthcare program to use all moneys distributed to the healthcare program pursuant to the
partnership contract to issue direct healthcare training scholarships to Kentucky students enrolled in the
healthcare program;
(c) If applicable to a healthcare program, require that the healthcare training scholarship application process
encourage applicants to complete the Free Application for Federal Student Aid; and
(d) Meet all other requirements set forth in this section and administrative regulation, including but not
limited to any reporting requirements to the council.
(4) Disbursements of moneys from the Kentucky healthcare workforce investment fund to support healthcare
training scholarships shall be made directly to a healthcare program pursuant to the terms of the partnership
contract.
(5) A healthcare program that enters a partnership contract shall solicit, accept, and review healthcare training
scholarship applications submitted by students enrolled in the healthcare program. A partnership contract may
require that a healthcare program do so in collaboration with the healthcare partner. The healthcare program
shall award healthcare training scholarships pursuant to any scholarship criteria set forth in the partnership
contract, this section, and administrative regulations. The decisions of the healthcare program in the issuance
of scholarships shall be final.
(6) A healthcare training scholarship issued by a healthcare program pursuant to a partnership contract shall be
made directly to a recipient pursuant to a written scholarship contract between the recipient and the healthcare
program. The scholarship contract shall not restrict the recipient's ability to utilize the scholarship for the total
cost of attendance. Each recipient of a scholarship shall:
(a) Agree in the written contract to practice as a licensed or certified medical professional in the
Commonwealth for a contract period of one (1) year for each academic year funded by the scholarship
up to a maximum of two (2) total years; and

CHAPTER 150 3
(b) Sign a promissory note as evidence of the scholarship and the obligation to repay the scholarship
amount upon failure to complete terms of the contract.
(7) A grantor may place restrictions upon a contribution to the Kentucky healthcare workforce investment fund
requiring specific criteria for a healthcare training scholarship or scholarships funded by the grantor's
dedicated funds to students who agree in the scholarship contract required by subsection (6)(a) of this section
to practice as a certified or licensed healthcare professional, including but not limited to criteria restricting:
(a) Except as provided in subsection (9) of this section, employment by the healthcare partner for the
contract period; or
(b) Employment at a location within a designated geographic area of the Commonwealth for the contract
period.
(8) The healthcare training scholarship contract shall grant the healthcare program, the Commonwealth, or the
healthcare partner the authority to initiate recoupment proceedings for the recovery of the total amount of all
healthcare training scholarships awarded to an individual that fails to complete the terms of a contract entered
into in accordance with subsection (6) of this section, together with reasonable attorney fees and interest at a
compound rate not to exceed eight percent (8%) per annum from the date of disbursement from the fund.
(9) (a) A healthcare training scholarship shall not[:
(a) ] be awarded to an applicant enrolled in a state registered nursing aide training and competency
evaluation program who is:
1. Not charged for any portion of the program pursuant to 42 C.F.R. sec. 483.152(c)(1); or
2. Eligible for reimbursement for the costs of the program pursuant to 42 C.F.R. sec. 483.152(c)(2)
prior to entering the scholarship contract.[; or]
(b) A healthcare training scholarship awarded to applicants enrolled in a state registered nursing aide
training and competency evaluation program shall not include an employment restriction that would
restrict the recipient to be employed by a specific healthcare partner for the contract period required by
subsection (6) of this section or that would otherwise constitute an offer of employment in accordance
with 42 C.F.R. sec. 483.152(c)(1).
(10) An applicant who has been listed on the nurse aide abuse registry with a substantiated finding of abuse,
neglect, or misappropriation of property shall not be eligible for a healthcare training scholarship.
Section 3. KRS 216B.020 is amended to read as follows:
(1) The provisions of this chapter that relate to the issuance of a certificate of need shall not apply to abortion
facilities as defined in KRS 216B.015; any hospital which does not charge its patients for hospital services and
does not seek or accept Medicare, Medicaid, or other financial support from the federal government or any
state government; assisted living residences; family care homes; state veterans' nursing homes; services
provided on a contractual basis in a rural primary-care hospital as provided under KRS 216.380; community
mental health centers for services as defined in KRS Chapter 210; primary care centers; rural health clinics;
private duty nursing services operating as health care services agencies as defined in KRS 216.718; group
homes; licensed residential crisis stabilization units; licensed free-standing residential substance use disorder
treatment programs with sixteen (16) or fewer beds, but not including Levels I and II psychiatric residential
treatment facilities or licensed psychiatric inpatient beds; outpatient behavioral health treatment, but not
including partial hospitalization programs; end stage renal disease dialysis facilities, freestanding or hospital
based; swing beds; special clinics, including but not limited to wellness, weight loss, family planning,
disability determination, speech and hearing, counseling, pulmonary care, and other clinics which only provide
diagnostic services with equipment not exceeding the major medical equipment cost threshold and for which
there are no review criteria in the state health plan; nonclinically related expenditures; nursing home beds that
shall be exclusively limited to on-campus residents of a certified continuing care retirement community; home
health services provided by a continuing care retirement community to its on-campus residents; the relocation
of hospital administrative or outpatient services into medical office buildings which are on or contiguous to the
premises of the hospital; the relocation of acute care beds which occur among acute care hospitals under
common ownership and which are located in the same area development district so long as there is no
substantial change in services and the relocation does not result in the establishment of a new service at the
receiving hospital for which a certificate of need is required; the redistribution of beds by licensure
classification within an acute care hospital so long as the redistribution does not increase the total licensed bed
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version

4 ACTS OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY
capacity of the hospital; residential hospice facilities established by licensed hospice programs; the following
health services provided on site in an existing health facility when the cost is less than six hundred thousand
dollars ($600,000) and the services are in place by December 30, 1991: psychiatric care where chemical
dependency services are provided, level one (1) and level two (2) of neonatal care, cardiac catheterization, and
open heart surgery where cardiac catheterization services are in place as of July 15, 1990; or ambulance
services operating in accordance with subsection (6), (7), or (8) of this section. These listed facilities or
services shall be subject to licensure, when applicable.
(2) Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to authorize the licensure, supervision, regulation, or control in any
manner of:
(a) Private offices and clinics of physicians, dentists, and other practitioners of the healing arts, except any
physician's office that meets the criteria set forth in KRS 216B.015(5) or that meets the definition of an
ambulatory surgical center as set out in KRS 216B.015;
(b) Office buildings built by or on behalf of a health facility for the exclusive use of physicians, dentists,
and other practitioners of the healing arts; unless the physician's office meets the criteria set forth in
KRS 216B.015(5), or unless the physician's office is also an abortion facility as defined in KRS
216B.015, except no capital expenditure or expenses relating to any such building shall be chargeable to
or reimbursable as a cost for providing inpatient services offered by a health facility;
(c) Outpatient health facilities or health services that:
1. Do not provide services or hold patients in the facility after midnight; and
2. Are exempt from certificate of need and licensure under subsection (3) of this section;
(d) Dispensaries and first-aid stations located within business or industrial establishments maintained solely
for the use of employees, if the facility does not contain inpatient or resident beds for patients or
employees who generally remain in the facility for more than twenty-four (24) hours;
(e) Establishments, such as motels, hotels, and boarding houses, which provide domiciliary and auxiliary
commercial services, but do not provide any health related services and boarding houses which are
operated by persons contracting with the United States Department of Veterans Affairs for boarding
services;
(f) The remedial care or treatment of residents or patients in any home or institution conducted only for
those who rely solely upon treatment by prayer or spiritual means in accordance with the creed or tenets
of any recognized church or religious denomination and recognized by that church or denomination;
and
(g) On-duty police and fire department personnel assisting in emergency situations by providing first aid or
transportation when regular emergency units licensed to provide first aid or transportation are unable to
arrive at the scene of an emergency situation within a reasonable time.
(3) The following outpatient categories of care shall be exempt from certificate of need and licensure on July 14,
2018:
(a) Primary care centers;
(b) Special health clinics, unless the clinic provides pain management services and is located off the
campus of the hospital that has majority ownership interest;
(c) Specialized medical technology services, unless providing a State Health Plan service;
(d) Retail-based health clinics and ambulatory care clinics that provide nonemergency, noninvasive
treatment of patients;
(e) Ambulatory care clinics treating minor illnesses and injuries;
(f) Mobile health services, unless providing a service in the State Health Plan;
(g) Rehabilitation agencies;
(h) Rural health clinics; and
(i) Off-campus, hospital-acquired physician practices.

CHAPTER 150 5
(4) The exemptions established by subsections (2) and (3) of this section shall not apply to the following
categories of care:
(a) An ambulatory surgical center as defined by KRS 216B.015(4);
(b) A health facility or health service that provides one (1) of the following types of services:
1. Cardiac catheterization;
2. Megavoltage radiation therapy;
3. Adult day health care;
4. Behavioral health services;
5. Chronic renal dialysis;
6. Birthing services; or
7. Emergency services above the level of treatment for minor illnesses or injuries;
(c) A pain management facility as defined by KRS 218A.175(1);
(d) An abortion facility that requires licensure pursuant to KRS 216B.0431; or
(e) A health facility or health service that requests an expenditure that exceeds the major medical
expenditure minimum.
(5) An existing facility licensed as an intermediate care or nursing home shall notify the cabinet of its intent to
change to a nursing facility as defined in Public Law 100-203. A certificate of need shall not be required for
conversion of an intermediate care or nursing home to the nursing facility licensure category.
(6) Ambulance services owned and operated by a city government, which propose to provide services in
coterminous cities outside of the ambulance service's designated geographic service area, shall not be required
to obtain a certificate of need if the governing body of the city in which the ambulance services are to be
provided enters into an agreement with the ambulance service to provide services in the city.
(7) Ambulance services owned by a hospital shall not be required to obtain a certificate of need for the sole
purpose of providing non-emergency and emergency transport services originating from its hospital.
(8) (a) As used in this subsection, "emergency ambulance transport services" means the transportation of an
individual that has an emergency medical condition with acute symptoms of sufficient severity that the
absence of immediate medical attention could reasonably be expected to place the individual's health in
serious jeopardy or result in the serious impairment or dysfunction of the individual's bodily organs.
(b) A city or county government that has conducted a public hearing for the purposes of demonstrating that
an imperative need exists in the city or county to provide emergency ambulance transport services
within its jurisdictional boundaries shall not be required to obtain a certificate of need for the city or
county to:
1. Directly provide emergency ambulance transport services as defined in this subsection within the
city's or county's jurisdictional boundaries; or
2. Enter into a contract with a hospital or hospitals within its jurisdiction, or within an adjoining
county if there are no hospitals located within the county, for the provision of emergency
ambulance transport services as defined in this subsection within the city's or county's
jurisdictional boundaries.
(c) Any license obtained under KRS Chapter 311A by a city or county for the provision of ambulance
services operating under a certificate of need exclusion pursuant to this subsection shall be held
exclusively by the city or county government and shall not be transferrable to any other entity.
(d) Prior to obtaining the written agreement of a city, an ambulance service operating under a county
government certificate of need exclusion pursuant to this subsection shall not provide emergency
ambulance transport services within the boundaries of any city that:
1. Possesses a certificate of need to provide emergency ambulance services;
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version

6 ACTS OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY
2. Has an agency or department thereof that holds a certificate of need to provide emergency
ambulance services; or
3. Is providing emergency ambulance transport services within its jurisdictional boundaries
pursuant to this subsection.
(9) (a) Except where a certificate of need is not required pursuant to subsection (6), (7), or (8) of this section,
the cabinet shall grant nonsubstantive review for a certificate of need proposal to establish an
ambulance service that is owned by a:
1. City government;
2. County government; or
3. Hospital, in accordance with paragraph (b) of this subsection.
(b) A notice shall be sent by the cabinet to all cities and counties that a certificate of need proposal to
establish an ambulance service has been submitted by a hospital. The legislative bodies of the cities and
counties affected by the hospital's certificate of need proposal shall provide a response to the cabinet
within thirty (30) days of receiving the notice. The failure of a city or county legislative body to respond
to the notice shall be deemed to be support for the proposal.
(c) An ambulance service established under this subsection shall not be transferred to another entity that
does not meet the requirements of paragraph (a) of this subsection without first obtaining a substantive
certificate of need.
(10) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, a continuing care retirement community's nursing home beds
shall not be certified as Medicaid eligible unless a certificate of need has been issued authorizing applications
for Medicaid certification. The provisions of subsection (5) of this section notwithstanding, a continuing care
retirement community shall not change the level of care licensure status of its beds without first obtaining a
certificate of need.
(11) An ambulance service established under subsection (9) of this section shall not be transferred to an entity that
does not qualify under subsection (9) of this section without first obtaining a substantive certificate of need.
[(12) (a) The provisions of subsections (7), (8), and (9) of this section shall expire on July 1, 2026.
(b) All actions taken by cities, counties, and hospitals, exemptions from obtaining a certificate of need, and
any certificate of need granted under subsections (7), (8), and (9) of this section prior to July 1, 2026,
shall remain in effect on and after July 1, 2026.]
Section 4. KRS 311A.030 is amended to read as follows:
(1) The board shall promulgate administrative regulations in accordance with KRS Chapter 13A to carry out the
functions of this chapter, including but not limited to:
(a) Classifying, licensing, inspecting, and regulating ambulance services, mobile integrated healthcare
programs, and medical first response providers; and
(b) Licensing, inspecting, and regulating emergency medical services training institutions.
(2) The licensure standards for ground ambulance providers shall distinguish between an ambulance service that
provides only emergency transportation, only scheduled ambulance transportation, or both types of
transportation.
(3) (a) The board shall not require an ambulance service to apply for licensure within a specified time
period following the issuance of a certificate of need by the Cabinet for Health and Family Services.
(b) The board may promulgate an administrative regulation in accordance with KRS Chapter 13A to
require an ambulance service to submit application progress reports on a six (6) month or annual
basis following the issuance of a certificate of need by the Cabinet for Health and Family Services
until the licensure application is submitted.
(c) An ambulance service that was issued a certificate of need on or after July 14, 2022, shall be eligible
to apply for licensure from the board without obtaining a new certificate of need from the Cabinet for
Health and Family Services.
Signed by Governor April 1, 2025.

CHAPTER 150 7
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version